Massachusetts, session 194th, H2923.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (r) of subdivision (1) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General
Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking, in line 351, the
words “to the Peace Corps” and inserting in place thereof the following:- “in an approved federal
service program”.
SECTION 2. Said paragraph (r) of subdivision (1) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the
General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 363, after the word
“service.” the following: - “For the purposes of this paragraph, “a volunteer in an approved
federal service program,” shall mean a volunteer or volunteer leader under part A of title VIII of
the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964, a full-time volunteer enrolled in a program under part A,
of 2

B, or C of title I of the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973, or a volunteer or volunteer
leader under the Peace Corps Act.”
of 2